District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.17

Shares — Payment; promissory notes and future services excluded.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 187, ch. 269, § 17
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.17.
1981 Ed., § 29-317.
1973 Ed., § 29-908d.